Utah statutes.
75-2-206.   Decedent's nonprobate transfers to the surviving spouse.
Excluding property passing to the surviving spouse under the federal Social
Security system, any death benefits paid to the surviving spouse under any
state workers' compensation law, and property excluded under Section 75-2-208,
the value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent's
nonprobate transfers to the decedent's surviving spouse, which consist of all
property that passed outside probate at the decedent's death from the decedent
to the surviving spouse by reason of the decedent's death, including:
(1)  the decedent's fractional interest in property held as a joint tenant
with the right of survivorship, to the extent that the decedent's fractional
interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving joint tenant;
(2)  the decedent's ownership interest in property or accounts held in co-
ownership registration with the right of survivorship, to the extent the
decedent's ownership interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving co-
owner; and
(3)  all other property that would have been included in the augmented estate
under Subsection 75-2-205(1) or (2) had it passed to or for the benefit of a
person other than the decedent's spouse, surviving spouse, the decedent, or
the decedent's creditors, estate, or estate creditors.
